testing/kom-tests.yaml
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: нёльнанныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: нёльнанныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: нёльнанныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: нёльнанныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: нёльнаннысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: нёльнаннаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: нёльнанныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: нёльнантӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: нёльнаннысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3: нёльнансяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнансьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: нёльнанныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: нёльнанланьныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнансяньныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Tra+PxPl3: нёльнантіныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнанланяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнанланьсьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнанланяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнанланьсяньныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанланьӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Tra+PxPl3: нёльнанланьтіныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанланьӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: нёльнанъяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: нёльнанъяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: нёльнанъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: нёльнанъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: нёльнанъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: нёльнанъяслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr: нёльнанъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: нёльнанъяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car: нёльнанъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cns: нёльнанъясла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp: нёльнанъясся
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine: нёльнанъясын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela: нёльнанъясысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: нёльнанъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr: нёльнанъяслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr: нёльнанъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl: нёльнанъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra: нёльнанъясті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter: нёльнанъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine: нёльнанъясланьын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela: нёльнанъясланьысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill: нёльнанъясланьӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr: нёльнанъясланьсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl: нёльнанъясланьӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra: нёльнанъясланьті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter: нёльнанъясланьӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: нёльнанъясӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: нёльнанъясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: нёльнанъясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: нёльнанъясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: нёльнанъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: нёльнанъяснам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: нёльнанъясӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Car: нёльнанъясӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cns: нёльнанъясӧйла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Comp: нёльнанъясӧйся
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанъясам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнанъяссьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанъясам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr: нёльнанъясӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Egr: нёльнанъясӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg1: нёльнанъястіым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанъясӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанъясланям
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнанъясланьсьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанъясланям
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Apr+Egr: нёльнанъясӧйланьсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанъясланьӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg1: нёльнанъясланьтіым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанъясланьӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: нёльнанъясыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: нёльнанъясыдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abl: нёльнанъясыдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: нёльнанъясыдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: нёльнанъястӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg2: нёльнанъяснад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: нёльнанъясыдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: нёльнанъястӧгыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cns: нёльнанъясыдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg2: нёльнанъяссяыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанъясад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнанъяссьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанъясад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: нёльнанъяссяньыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанъясӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg2: нёльнанъястіыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанъясӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланяд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланьсьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланяд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланьсяньыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланьӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланьтіыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанъясланьӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: нёльнанъясыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: нёльнанъясыслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abl: нёльнанъясыслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: нёльнанъясыслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: нёльнанъяссӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg3: нёльнанъяснас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: нёльнанъясыскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: нёльнанъястӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cns: нёльнанъясысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxSg3: нёльнанъяссяыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанъясас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнанъяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанъясас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: нёльнанъяссяньыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанъясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxSg3: нёльнанъястіыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанъясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланьсьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланьсяньыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланьӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланьтіыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанъясланьӧдзыc
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: нёльнанъясным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: нёльнанъяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: нёльнанъяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: нёльнанъяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: нёльнанъяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: нёльнанъяснаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: нёльнанъяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: нёльнанъястӧгным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: нёльнанъяснымла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1: нёльнанъяссяным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнанъясаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнанъяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнанъясаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланьным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: нёльнанъяссяньным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанъясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl1: нёльнанъястіным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанъясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланяным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланьсьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланяным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланьсяньным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланьӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланьтіным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанъясланьӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: нёльнанъясныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: нёльнанъясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: нёльнанъясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: нёльнанъясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: нёльнанъясныдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: нёльнанъяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: нёльнанъясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: нёльнанъястӧгныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: нёльнанъясныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: нёльнанъяссяныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнанъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнанъяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнанъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: нёльнанъясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: нёльнанъяссяньныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанъясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl2: нёльнанъястіныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанъясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланяныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланьсьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланяныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланьсяньныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланьӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Tra+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланьтіныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанъясланьӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нёльнанъясныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: нёльнанъясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: нёльнанъясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: нёльнанъясныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: нёльнанъяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: нёльнанъяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: нёльнанъясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: нёльнанъястӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: нёльнанъяснысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: нёльнанъяссяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнанъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнанъяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнанъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльнанъясныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльнанъясланьныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнанъяссяньныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанъясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Tra+PxPl3: нёльнанъястіныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанъясӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнанъясланяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнанъясланьсьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнанъясланяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнанъясланьсяньныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанъясланьӧдныс
